New York, session 2025-2026, S5218.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. The commissioner shall establish a "purple star schools program" 4 to recognize schools and school districts which demonstrate a commitment 5 to assisting military-connected students and their families. 6 a. The commissioner, or such commissioner's designee, shall designate 7 a school as a "purple star school" upon application of a school or 8 school district which: 9 (i) has designated a staff member as a military liaison whose duties 10 include: (A) identifying military-connected students enrolled in the 11 district; (B) serving as the point of contact between the school or 12 school district and such students; (C) determining appropriate campus 13 services available to military-connected students; and (D) assisting in 14 coordinating campus programs relevant to military-connected students; 15 (ii) maintains on its website an easily accessible page that includes 16 resources for military-connected students and their families, including 17 information regarding: (A) relocation to, enrollment at, registration 18 at, and transferring records to the campus; (B) academic planning, 19 course sequences, and advanced classes available at the campus; (C) 20 counseling and other support services available for military-connected 21 students enrolled at the campus; (D) the military liaison designated 22 under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, and the liaison's duties under 23 such subparagraph; and (E) the state military family education liaison 24 designated pursuant to section thirty-three hundred eight of this chap- 25 ter; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08231-01-5 S. 5218 2 1 (iii) maintains a transition program led by students, where appropri- 2 ate, that assists military-connected students in transitioning into the 3 campus; 4 (iv) offers professional development for staff members on issues 5 related to military-connected students; 6 (v) for purposes of monitoring academic progress of military-connected 7 students, includes an identifier on the student record of a military- 8 connected student and include in the basic educational data system 9 reports (BEDS), the number of military-connected students enrolled in 10 such school or school district; and 11 (vi) the board of education or other person or entity authorized to 12 act on behalf of the school or school district has either: (A) issued a 13 resolution, proclamation, or other official statement of support for 14 military-connected students and their families; or (B) issued a resol- 15 ution, proclamation, or other official statement recognizing the month 16 of April as the "month of the military child" and/or the month of Novem- 17 ber as "military family month" and has hosted events on campus celebrat- 18 ing either or both; or (C) entered into a partnership with a military 19 installation, national guard armory or reserve center that provides 20 opportunities for military members to volunteer at the campus, speak at 21 an assembly, host a field trip, or participate in such other educational 22 activities as the commissioner or such commissioner's designee deems 23 appropriate. 24 b. A school or school district may partner with a third party to 25 provide those services and initiatives specified under paragraph a of 26 this subdivision. 27 c. The commissioner may promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of 28 this subdivision. 29 d. As used in this subdivision, "military-connected student" means a 30 school-aged child enrolled in kindergarten through twelfth grade in the 31 household of an active duty member of the United States military, a 32 reserve force of the United States military, the organized militia of 33 this state or any other state. 34 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.